Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,137
Clerk of county or district court; report convictions and judgments of credentialed person; Attorney General or prosecutor; duty.

The clerk of any county or district court in this state shall report to the department the conviction of any person credentialed by the department under the Uniform Credentialing Act of any felony or of any misdemeanor involving the use, sale, distribution, administration, or dispensing of a controlled substance, alcohol or chemical impairment, or substance abuse and shall also report a judgment against any such credential holder arising out of a claim of professional liability. The Attorney General or city or county prosecutor prosecuting any such criminal action and plaintiff in any such civil action shall provide the court with information concerning the credential of the defendant or party. Notice to the department shall be filed within thirty days after the date of conviction or judgment in a manner agreed to by the director and the State Court Administrator.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 24;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 39;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 480;

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 45;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 24;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 32;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,339;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 362;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 137.